District of Columbia statutes.
2-218.65

Certification audits.

The District of Columbia Auditor may conduct random audits of certification files to determine whether the Department followed the requirements set forth in § 2-218.61. The District of Columbia Auditor shall submit findings and recommendations to the Department and the Council.

History

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2365
as added Apr. 20, 2010, D.C. Law 18-141, § 2(p), 57 DCR 1485